test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kv26_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # kv_
    tá+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: tá
    tá+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: tá
    tá+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: tá
    tá+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: táar
    tá+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: tær
    tá+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: tóm
    tá+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: táa
    tá+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: táin
    tá+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: tánna
    tá+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: tánni
    tá+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: táarinnar
    tá+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: tærnar
    tá+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: [tónum, tærnum]
    tá+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: táanna
